California, session 20252026, AB1614.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21204 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21204. (a)  A person operating a bicycle upon a highway or a Class I bikeway, as defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, shall not ride other than upon or astride a permanent and regular seat attached thereto, unless the bicycle was designed by the manufacturer to be ridden without a seat.(b)  An operator shall not allow a person riding as a passenger, and a person shall not ride as a passenger, on a bicycle upon a highway or a Class I bikeway, as defined in Section 890.4 of the Streets and Highways Code, other than upon or astride a separate seat attached thereto. If the passenger is four years of age or younger, or weighs 40 pounds or less, the seat shall have adequate provision for retaining the passenger in place and for protecting the passenger from the moving parts of the bicycle.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.